Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5966.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) Any benefit administered by the department through contracted entities to provide medically tailored meals to clients under this chapter shall require that medically tailored meals be, to the extent possible, provided by Washington state-based, nonprofit organizations.(b) Medically tailored meal vendors shall comply with the client's medically tailored meal nutrition care plan. The medically tailored meal vendor shall have a qualified medical professional review and approve the menus provided in response to a nutrition care plan for medically tailored meals.(c) All medically tailored meals provided to clients under this chapter shall:(i) Align with evidence-based nutritional practice guidelines for treating the specified condition;(ii) Offer accommodations in dietary needs, allergy restrictions, and cultural preferences;(iii) Prioritize local, whole foods or from scratch prepared meals unless otherwise required to appropriately meet the needs of a client;(iv) Provide at least 500 calories, or otherwise meet a client's medically appropriate energy needs; and(v) Provide one-third of the recommended dietary reference intakes for carbohydrates and protein as established by the food and nutrition board of the national academy of medicine, unless otherwise permitted.(2) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Medically tailored meal" means a fresh or frozen meal that is designed by a qualified medical professional for the treatment of one or more medical conditions of a client.(b) "Medically tailored meal vendor" means a vendor that provides medically tailored meals according to specifications from a qualified medical professional.(c) "Qualified medical professional" means a person who holds a credential issued by a disciplining authority under RCW 18.130.040 and whose credential includes the authority to establish and tailor nutrition care plans to meet the medical needs of a referred client.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) Any benefit administered by the authority through contracted entities to provide medically tailored meals to enrollees under this chapter shall require that medically tailored meals be, to the extent possible, provided by Washington state-based, nonprofit organizations.(b) Medically tailored meal vendors shall comply with the enrollee's medically tailored meal nutrition care plan. The medically tailored meal vendor shall have a qualified medical professional review and approve the menus provided in response to a nutrition care plan for medically tailored meals.(c) All medically tailored meals provided to enrollees under this chapter shall:(i) Align with evidence-based nutritional practice guidelines for treating the specified condition;(ii) Offer accommodations in dietary needs, allergy restrictions, and cultural preferences;(iii) Prioritize local, whole foods or from scratch prepared meals unless otherwise required to appropriately meet the needs of an enrollee;(iv) Provide at least 500 calories, or otherwise meet an enrollee's medically appropriate energy needs; and(v) Provide one-third of the recommended dietary reference intakes for carbohydrates and protein as established by the food and nutrition board of the national academy of medicine, unless otherwise permitted.(2) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Medically tailored meal" means a fresh or frozen meal that is designed by a qualified medical professional for the treatment of one or more medical conditions of an enrollee.(b) "Medically tailored meal vendor" means a vendor that provides medically tailored meals according to specifications from a qualified medical professional.(c) "Qualified medical professional" means a person who holds a credential issued by a disciplining authority under RCW 18.130.040 and whose credential includes the authority to establish and tailor nutrition care plans to meet the medical needs of a referred client.--- END ---